nl: Coupure: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1000 dollar; 10 cent; 10 dollar; 10.000 dollar; 100 dollar; 2 dollar; 20 dollar; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 dollar; 5000 dollar; 50 cent; 50 dollar; 500 dollar; Aemi; Andere
hr-HR: Apoen: 1 cent (peni); 1 dolar; 1000 dolara; 10 centi; 10 dolara; 10 000 dolara; 100 dolara; 2 dolara; 20 dolara; 25 centi; 5 centi; 5 dolara; 5000 dolara; 50 centi; 50 dolara; 500 dolara; Aemi; Ostalo
it: Taglio: 1 centesimo (penny); 1 dollaro; 1.000 dollari; 10 centesimi; 10 dollari; 10.000 dollari; 100 dollari; 2 dollari; 20 dollari; 25 centesimi; 5 centesimi; 5 dollari; 5.000 dollari; 50 centesimi; 50 dollari; 500 dollari; Aemi; Altro
cs: Nominální hodnota: 1 cent (penny); 1 dolar; 1 000 dolarů; 10 centů; 10 dolarů; 10 000 dolarů; 100 dolarů; 2 dolary; 20 dolarů; 25 centů; 5 centů; 5 dolarů; 5 000 dolarů; 50 centů; 50 dolarů; 500 dolarů; Aemi; Jiné
sl-SI: Denominacija: 1 cent (peni); 1 dolar; 1.000 dolar; 10 centov; 10 dolarjev; 10.000 dolarjev; 100 dolarjev; 2 dolarja; 20 dolarjev; 25 centov; 5 centov; 5 dolarjev; 5.000 dolarjev; 50 centov; 50 dolarjev; 500 dolarjev; Aemi; Drugo
vi: Mệnh giá: 1 cent (xu 1 cent); 1 đô la; 1.000 đô la; 10 cent; 10 đô la; 10.000 đô la; 100 đô la; 2 đô la; 20 đô la; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 đô la; 5.000 đô la; 50 cent; 50 đô la; 500 đô la; Aemi; Khác
sv: Valör: 1 cent (öre); 1 dollar; 1 000 dollar; 10 cent; 10 dollar; 10 000 dollar; 100 dollar; 2 dollar; 20 dollar; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 dollar; 5 000 dollar; 50 cent; 50 dollar; 500 dollar; Aemi; Övrigt
de: Stückelung: 1 Cent (Penny); 1 Dollar; 1.000 Dollar; 10 Cent; 10 Dollar; 10.000 Dollar; 100 Dollar; 2 Dollar; 20 Dollar; 25 Cent; 5 Cent; 5 Dollar; 5.000 Dollar; 50 Cent; 50 Dollar; 500 Dollar; Aemi; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Деноминация: 1 цент (пени); 1 долар; 1 000 долара; 10 цента; 10 долара; 10 000 долара; 100 долара; 2 долара; 20 долара; 25 цента; 5 цента; 5 долара; 5 000 долара; 50 цента; 50 долара; 500 долара; Aemi; Други
hu: Címlet: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollár; 1000 dollár; 10 cent; 10 dollár; 10 000 dollár; 100 dollár; 2 dollár; 20 dollár; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 dollár; 5000 dollár; 50 cent; 50 dollár; 500 dollár; Aemi; Egyéb
nb: Benevnelse: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1000 dollar; 10 cent; 10 dollar; 10 000 dollar; 100 dollar; 2 dollar; 20 dollar; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 dollar; 5000 dollar; 50 cent; 50 dollar; 500 dollar; Aemi; Annet
ko: 액면가: 1센트(페니); 1달러; 1,000달러; 10센트; 10달러; 10,000달러; 100달러; 2달러; 20달러; 25센트; 5센트; 5달러; 5,000달러; 50센트; 50달러; 500달러; AEMI; 기타
en: Denomination: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1,000 dollars; 10 cents; 10 dollars; 10,000 dollars; 100 dollars; 2 dollars; 20 dollars; 25 cents; 5 cents; 5 dollars; 5,000 dollars; 50 cents; 50 dollars; 500 dollars; Aemi; Other
ru: Номинал: 1 цент (пенни); 1 доллар; 1000 долларов; 10 центов; 10 долларов; 10 000 долларов; 100 долларов; 2 доллара; 20 долларов; 25 центов; 5 центов; 5 долларов; 5000 долларов; 50 центов; 50 долларов; 500 долларов; Аэми; Другое
pt-BR: Denominação: 1 centavo; 1 dólar; 1.000 dólares; 10 centavos; 10 dólares; 10.000 dólares; 100 dólares; 2 dólares; 20 dólares; 25 centavos; 5 centavos; 5 dólares; 5.000 dólares; 50 centavos; 50 dólares; 500 dólares; Aemi; Outro
da: Denomination: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1.000 dollar; 10 cent; 10 dollar; 10.000 dollar; 100 dollar; 2 dollar; 20 dollar; 25 cent; 5 cent; 5 dollar; 5.000 dollar; 50 cent; 50 dollar; 500 dollar; Aemi; Andet
es: Denominación: 1 centavo (penique); 1 dólar; 1000 dólares; 10 centavos; 10 dólares; 10 000 dólares; 100 dólares; 2 dólares; 20 dólares; 25 centavos; 5 centavos; 5 dólares; 5000 dólares; 50 centavos; 50 dólares; 500 dólares; Aemi; Otros
ja: 通貨単位: 1セント (ペニー); 1ドル; 1,000ドル; 10セント; 10ドル; 10,000ドル; 100ドル; 2ドル; 20ドル; 25セント; 5セント; 5ドル; 5,000ドル; 50セント; 50ドル; 500ドル; AEMI; その他
tr: Nominal Değer: 1 sent (kuruş); 1 dolar; 1.000 dolar; 10 sent; 10 dolar; 10.000 dolar; 100 dolar; 2 dolar; 20 dolar; 25 sent; 5 sent; 5 dolar; 5.000 dolar; 50 sent; 50 dolar; 500 dolar; Aemi; Diğer
ro-RO: Valoare: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1.000 de dolari; 10 cenți; 10 dolari; 10.000 de dolari; 100 de dolari; 2 dolari; 20 de dolari; 25 de cenți; 5 cenți; 5 dolari; 5.000 de dolari; 50 de cenți; 50 de dolari; 500 de dolari; Aemi; Altele
fr: Désignation: 1 cent (penny); 1 dollar; 1 000 dollars; 10 cents; 10 dollars; 10,000 dollars; 100 dollars; 2 dollars; 20 dollars; 25 cents; 5 cents; 5 dollars; 5,000 dollars; 50 cents; 50 dollars; 500 dollars; Aémi; Autre
th: หน่วยเงินตรา: 1 เซนต์ (เพนนี); 1 ดอลลาร์; 1,000 ดอลลาร์; 10 เซนต์; 10 ดอลลาร์; 10,000 ดอลลาร์; 100 ดอลลาร์; 2 ดอลลาร์; 20 ดอลลาร์; 25 เซนต์; 5 เซนต์; 5 ดอลลาร์; 5,000 ดอลลาร์; 50 เซนต์; 50 ดอลลาร์; 500 ดอลลาร์; AEMI; อื่นๆ
el: Ονομαστική αξία: 1 σεντ (πένα); 1 δολάριο; 1.000 δολάρια; 10 σεντς; 10 δολάρια; 10.000 δολάρια; 100 δολάρια; 2 δολάρια; 20 δολάρια; 25 σεντς; 5 σεντς; 5 δολάρια; 5.000 δολάρια; 50 σεντς; 50 δολάρια; 500 δολάρια; Aemi; Άλλο
fi: Nimellisarvo: 1 sentti (penni); 1 dollari; 1 000 dollaria; 10 senttiä; 10 dollaria; 10 000 dollaria; 100 dollaria; 2 dollaria; 20 dollaria; 25 senttiä; 5 senttiä; 5 dollaria; 5 000 dollaria; 50 senttiä; 50 dollaria; 500 dollaria; Aemi; Muu
sk-SK: Nominálna hodnota: 1 cent (penny); 1 dolár; 1000 dolárov; 10 centov; 10 dolárov; 10 000 dolárov; 100 dolárov; 2 doláre; 20 dolárov; 25 centov; 5 centov; 5 dolárov; 5 000 dolárov; 50 centov; 50 dolárov; 500 dolárov; Aemi; Iné
pl: Nominał: 1 cent; 1 dolar; 1 000 dolarów; 10 centów; 10 dolarów; 10 000 dolarów; 100 dolarów; 2 dolary; 20 dolarów; 25 centów; 5 centów; 5 dolarów; 5 000 dolarów; 50 centów; 50 dolarów; 500 dolarów; Aemi; Inne
pt-PT: Denominação: 1 cêntimo (centavo); 1 dólar; 1000 dólares; 10 cêntimos; 10 dólares; 10 000 dollars; 100 dólares; 2 dólares; 20 dólares; 25 cêntimos; 5 cêntimos; 5 dólares; 5000 dólares; 50 cêntimos; 50 dólares; 500 dólares; Aemi; Outro
zh-CN: 面值: 1 分（便士）; 1 美元; 1,000 美元; 10 美分; 10 美元; 10,000 美元; 100 美元; 2 美元; 20 美元; 25 美分; 5 美分; 5 美元; 5,000 美元; 50 美分; 50 美元; 500 美元; AEMI; 其他
zh-TW: 面額: 1 美分（便士）; 1 美元; 1,000 美元; 10 美分; 10 美元; 10,000 美元; 100 美元; 2 美元; 20 美元; 25 美分; 5 美分; 5 美元; 5,000 美元; 50 美分; 50 美元; 500 美元; 愛美; 其他
lt-LT: Denominacija: 1 centas (pensas); 1 doleris; 1 000 dolerių; 10 centų; 10 dolerių; 10 000 dolerių; 100 dolerių; 2 doleriai; 20 dolerių; 25 centai; 5 centai; 5 doleriai; 5 000 dolerių; 50 centų; 50 dolerių; 500 dolerių; Aemi; Kita